New York, session 2025-2026, A6259.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 25 of the laws of 2 2020, providing requirements for sick leave and the provision of certain 3 employee benefits when such employee is subject to a mandatory or 4 precautionary order of quarantine or isolation due to COVID-19, is 5 amended by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 6 (f) Daycare facility or childcare facility employers are exempt from 7 the requirement of this chapter to provide paid sick leave to their 8 employees. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 10 the amendments to section 1 of chapter 25 of the laws of 2020, providing 11 requirements for sick leave and the provision of certain employee bene- 12 fits when such employee is subject to a mandatory or precautionary order 13 of quarantine or isolation due to COVID-19, made by section one of this 14 act shall expire on the same date as such section and shall be deemed 15 repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08862-01-5